src/gobelo_grammar_toolkit/hfst/chitonga_hfst/chitonga.lexc
LEXICON ClosedClass
! AUTO-GENERATED FROM closed_class.yaml — stub examples
! Conjunctions
  a%+CONJ:a # ;           ! and / at / of
  aabona%+CONJ:aabona # ; ! sometimes
  naa%+CONJ:naa # ;       ! or / with (high-frequency: 3215 in corpus)
  kuti%+CONJ:kuti # ;     ! that / so that (most frequent token: 15420)
  alimwi%+CONJ:alimwi # ; ! also / and (10151 in corpus)
  kuli%+PREP:kuli # ;     ! to / at (locative)
! Demonstratives (non-inflecting surface forms stored whole)
  aabo%+DEM:aabo # ;      ! those (NC2 distal)
  abano%+DEM:abano # ;    ! these (NC2 proximal)
  ababo%+DEM:ababo # ;    ! those yonder (NC2 distal)
  aalya%+DEM:aalya # ;    ! on yonder (NC16)
! Pronouns
  aalo%+PRON:aalo # ;     ! it also (NC6)
  abalabo%+PRON:abalabo # ; ! they also (NC2/NC14)
! Adverbs
  aakale%+ADV:aakale # ;  ! later on
! ... (remaining closed class items from closed_class.yaml)
